Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.625

Agreements for research work by private nonprofit corporations at universities—Funds may be expended in cooperative effort.

The boards of regents of the state universities may expend funds available to said institutions in any cooperative effort with such corporations which will further the objects of the particular university and may permit any such corporation or corporations to use any property of the university in carrying on said functions.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.625. Prior: 1949 c 152 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4543-31. Formerly RCW 28.76.380.]